Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2618
District court; jurisdiction; act; how construed.

(a) The term court shall mean any district court of this state. The making of an agreement described in section 25-2602.01 providing for arbitration in this state confers jurisdiction on the court to enforce the agreement under the Uniform Arbitration Act and to enter judgment on an award thereunder.

(b) Nothing in the Uniform Arbitration Act shall be construed to empower the Commission of Industrial Relations to order that any party under its jurisdiction submit to, or contract to submit to, arbitration.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 151, § 9.

Jurisdiction over confirmation of arbitration awards is conferred upon the district court, and the county court has no such jurisdiction. MBNA America Bank v. Hansen, 16 Neb. App. 536, 745 N.W.2d 609 (2008).